Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 23
FRUITS, VEGETABLES, AND OTHER
AGRICULTURAL PRODUCTS

Cross references:

For the effect of the "Colorado Agricultural Marketing Act of 1939" on this article 23, see § 35-28-123.

Section

35-23-101. Legislative declaration.

The purpose of this article is to provide the means whereby producers, shippers, carriers, buyers, and sellers of fruits, vegetables, and such other agricultural products as may be mutually agreed upon, on application, may secure prompt and efficient inspection and classification of such products. The standardization of the produce industry by means of the proper classification and grading of fruits, vegetables, and other agricultural products is recognized to be beneficial to the producer, carrier, shipper, buyer, seller, and consumer. Prompt and efficient inspection, under competent authority, furnishes the producer and the shipper prima facie evidence of quality and condition of products; it guarantees the carrier and the receiver as to the quality and condition of products carried and received by them; and it assures the ultimate consumer of the quality and condition of products purchased.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 368, § 1.

CSA:

C. 69, § 60.

CRS 53:

§ 7-6-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-5-1.

L. 71:

p. 155, § 1.

35-23-102. Responsible officer.

The inspection in this state of fruits, vegetables, and other agricultural products, and the classification of grades thereof, shall be under the direction and control of the commissioner of agriculture.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 369, § 2.

CSA:

C. 69, § 61.

CRS 53:

§ 7-6-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-5-2.

L. 71:

p. 155, § 2.

35-23-103. Federal cooperation.

The commissioner is empowered to enter into such agreements with the United States department of agriculture as he may determine to be necessary or advisable for the establishment of a joint state and federal inspection service in Colorado for fruits, vegetables, and other agricultural products.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 369, § 3.

CSA:

C. 69, § 62.

CRS 53:

§ 7-6-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-5-3.

35-23-104. Employees of inspection service.

Pursuant to section 13 of article XII of the state constitution, the commissioner shall employ and discharge such supervisors, deputies, inspectors, and employees as the needs of the inspection service require. Inspectors shall be experienced in the inspection of fruits, vegetables, and other agricultural products, and in commercial packing practices, and shall hold, at the time of appointment, a federal inspector's license.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 369, § 4.

CSA:

C. 69, § 63.

L. 45:

p. 342, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 7-6-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-5-4.

L. 71:

p. 155, § 3.

35-23-105. Authority to enter business places.

In carrying out the provisions of this article, the commissioner and his deputies, inspectors, and employees are authorized to enter on any business day, during the usual hours of business, any storehouse, warehouse, cold storage plant, packing house, or other building or place where fruits, vegetables, or other agricultural products are kept or stored by any person engaged in the shipping of fruits, vegetables, or other agricultural products, or to stop or inspect at any time any automobile, truck, trailer, or other vehicle transporting or containing any such fruits, vegetables, or other agricultural products.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 370, § 5.

CSA:

C. 69, § 64.

CRS 53:

§ 7-6-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-5-5.

L. 71:

p. 156, § 4.

35-23-106. Establishment of regulations and grades.

The commissioner is empowered to establish and enforce such grades, grading rules, and regulations in addition to those established by this article, in no event less than the minimum requirements prescribed by this article, as he may deem necessary on fruits, vegetables, and other agricultural products, which shall not conflict with any provisions of this article, after a thorough investigation has been made of the needs of the particular fruit, vegetable, or other agricultural product for which grades, grading rules, and regulations are contemplated; but, whenever it is deemed advisable by the commissioner, such grades shall be the same as the grades promulgated by the United States department of agriculture. Such grades, grading rules, and regulations, before they become effective, shall be submitted for approval at one or more public meetings called for that purpose and attended by representative growers and shippers of the localities interested in the industry affected. Such meetings shall be advertised at least once in a newspaper published in such localities, one week or more prior to the meeting. Said meeting shall be presided over by the commissioner or any of his duly authorized deputies and, insofar as possible and practicable, shall be conducted at such places as can be conveniently reached by representatives of the affected industry. Grades, grading rules, and regulations, established in accordance with the provisions of this section, shall not be modified during the current shipping season of the fruit, vegetable, or other agricultural product for which they are established. In like manner the commissioner may provide for standard packages for all fruits, vegetables, and other agricultural products, but no standard packages shall be eliminated or changed without two years' notice to the industry involved.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 371, § 6.

CSA:

C. 69, § 65.

CRS 53:

§ 7-6-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-5-6.

L. 71:

p. 156, § 5.

Cross references:

For rule-making procedures, see article 4 of title 24.

35-23-107. Appeal to change regulations and grades.

On receipt of a written appeal by representative growers or shippers representing at least fifty-one percent of the acreage of the commodity for which grades, grading rules, regulations, or standard packages have been established by the commissioner under the provisions of this section and section 35-23-106, protesting against the grades, grading rules, regulations, or standard packages so established, the commissioner shall call a hearing. Due notice shall be given by the commissioner to all interested parties of the date and place of such hearing, and the grades, grading rules, regulations, or standard packages shall be sustained, modified, or revoked, in the discretion of the commissioner on the basis of the evidence presented. If such grades, grading rules, regulations, or standard packages are not changed or modified by the commissioner, in accordance with the provisions of this section and section 35-23-106, they shall continue to be in full force and effect. Grades, grading rules, regulations, and standard packages, established under the provisions of this section and section 35-23-106, shall be promulgated by the commissioner and published at least once in one or more newspapers or farm journals of general circulation in the state.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 372, § 6.

CSA:

C. 69, § 66.

CRS 53:

§ 7-6-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-5-7.

35-23-108. Power of regulation.

The commissioner, with the concurrence of the state agricultural commission, is authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations relative to the proper marking of containers, the issue of certificates of inspection, the tagging of the vehicle of transportation, and such other rules and regulations as he deems necessary for the improvement of the quality of marketing of all fruits, vegetables, or other agricultural products.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 372, § 7.

CSA:

C. 69, § 67.

CRS 53:

§ 7-6-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-5-8.

L. 71:

p. 157, § 6.

35-23-109. Engaging in trade prohibited.

The commissioner and his deputies, inspectors, and employees are each prohibited, during their respective terms of employment or office, from engaging in this state or elsewhere, either directly or indirectly, in the business of buying or selling fruits, vegetables, or other agricultural products or in dealing in the same on commission.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 373, § 8.

CSA:

C. 69, § 68.

CRS 53:

§ 7-6-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-5-9.

35-23-110. Malfeasance of inspectors - penalty.

Any inspector employed under this article 23 who knowingly makes a wrong or improper inspection of any fruit, vegetable, or other agricultural product, or knowingly and improperly certifies that the grade, quality, or condition of a fruit, vegetable, or other agricultural product does or does not conform to the standards established under this article 23, or fails to bring action to prosecute any violators of this article 23, or accepts money or other consideration directly or indirectly for an incorrect or improper performance of the inspector's duty, and any person who improperly influences any such inspector in the performance of the inspector's duty, commits a petty offense.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 373, § 9.

CSA:

C. 69, § 69.

CRS 53:

§ 7-6-10.

L. 63:

p. 321, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-5-10.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3277, § 621, effective March 1, 2022.

35-23-111. Inspection made mandatory.

It is unlawful for any person, firm, corporation, or other organization to ship potatoes in excess of one thousand pounds, except those destined for commercial processing, unless they have first been inspected by a duly authorized inspector who shall issue a certificate of inspection showing the grade or other classification thereof.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 374, § 10.

CSA:

C. 69, § 70.

L. 53:

p. 312, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 7-6-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-5-11.

L. 71:

p. 157, § 7.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 705, § 22, effective May 23.

35-23-112. Appeal of inspection.

Any interested party, who is dissatisfied with any classification of grades of any fruits, vegetables, or other agricultural products made as the result of inspection under this article, within such time after the inspection and in such manner as shall be prescribed by the commissioner, may appeal to the commissioner, and the commissioner is directed to promulgate rules and regulations governing the time and manner of such appeal. Upon such appeal to him being regularly taken, the commissioner shall cause such investigation to be made and such tests to be applied as he may deem necessary to determine the true grade or classification in the particular case in question and shall issue a finding determining the true grade or classification in the particular case. Whenever an appeal to the commissioner is taken, he shall fix and assess, and collect or cause to be collected, the established fee for an original inspection for each such appeal, which shall be uniform and which shall be refunded to the person paying the same, if the findings of the commissioner on appeal are to the effect that the grade or classification as determined and certified on the original inspection was erroneous and a new or different grade or classification is determined by the commissioner. Any reinspection certificate issued as the result of an appeal shall supersede the original inspection certificate.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 374, § 11.

CSA:

C. 69, § 71.

CRS 53:

§ 7-6-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-5-12.

L. 71:

p. 157, § 8.

35-23-113. Issuance of certificate of inspection.

A certificate evidencing that official inspection has been made and designating the classification of the grades of fruits, vegetables, or other agricultural products so inspected shall be issued by the inspector and delivered to the applicant. A certificate so issued shall be accepted in any court of this state as prima facie evidence of the true grade or other classification of such fruit, vegetable, or other agricultural product at the time of inspection.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 376, § 14.

CSA:

C. 69, § 74.

CRS 53:

§ 7-6-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-5-15.

L. 71:

p. 157, § 9.

35-23-114. Inspection fees - agricultural products inspection cash fund.

The state agricultural commission, after conferring with interested industry groups, is authorized to fix, assess, and collect fees for the inspection and issuance of certificates of inspection on fruits, vegetables, and other agricultural products.

Such fees shall be uniform for the particular service rendered. The amount of such fees for services rendered under the provisions of this article shall be determined by the commission as nearly as may be to the end that such fees shall pay at least fifty percent of the operational cost of the inspection service mandated by section

35-23-111

, but appropriations from the general fund shall be fifty percent of the operational cost of such mandatory inspection or two hundred thousand dollars, whichever is the lesser amount, and one hundred percent of the operational costs of all other inspection services provided pursuant to this article. Such fees shall be paid by the person, firm, corporation, or other organization requesting the service at the time such service is rendered or as otherwise provided and authorized by the commission.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 93, p. 353, § 1, effective April 12, 1993.)

Fees for inspections mandated by section 35-23-111 and fees for all other inspection services provided pursuant to this article and collected under the provisions of this section shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the agricultural products inspection cash fund, which fund is hereby created. All interest derived from the deposit or investment of moneys credited to the agricultural products inspection cash fund shall also be credited to the fund. All moneys credited to the agricultural products inspection cash fund shall be used as provided in this section and shall not be deposited in or transferred to the general fund of this state or any other fund. All moneys in said fund are to be appropriated by the general assembly to the department of agriculture to be used for inspection services provided pursuant to this article. Moneys in the agricultural products inspection cash fund may be used:

Repealed.

For the department's direct and indirect costs; except that, effective July 1, 2006, no more than five percent of said moneys shall be used for the department's indirect costs.

Repealed.

Within sixty days after July 1, 2009, the unexpended and unencumbered balance of the mandatory fruit and vegetable inspection fund, as that fund existed prior to July 1, 2009, shall be transferred to the agricultural products inspection cash fund.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 378, § 18.

CSA:

C. 69, § 78.

L. 45:

p. 342, § 2.

L. 51:

p. 409, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 7-6-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-5-19.

L. 65:

p. 197, § 10.

L. 71:

p. 158, § 10.

L. 73:

p. 201, § 1.

L. 84:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 938, § 1, effective April 27.

L. 85:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 1137, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 159, § 2, effective February 25.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 353, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 2002:

(3) amended, p. 878, § 9, effective August 7.

L. 2003:

(3) amended, p. 390, § 3, effective March 5; (3) amended, p. 382, § 1, effective March 5.

L. 2009:

IP(3)(a) amended and (4) added, (HB 09-1249), ch. 87, p. 320, § 17, effective July 1.

35-23-115. Information confidential.

All information obtained as the result of any inspection made under the provisions of this article shall not be open to inspection by the public; except that the commissioner shall prepare and certify to any financially interested party a copy of the original inspection certificate of any inspection upon the payment to him of his fees therefor. The commissioner is authorized to prescribe rules and regulations governing the issuance of such certificates.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 380, § 20.

CSA:

C. 69, § 80.

CRS 53:

§ 7-6-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-5-20.

L. 71:

p. 158, § 11.

Cross references:

For rule-making procedures, see article 4 of title 24.

35-23-116. Penalty.

Any person, firm, corporation, or other organization that violates any of the provisions of this article 23 or willfully interferes with the commissioner or the commissioner's deputies, inspectors, or employees in the performance or on account of the execution of the commissioner's duties as provided by this article 23 commits a petty offense. In addition to the criminal penalty, any person convicted under this article 23 shall be punished by the revoking of the person's license by the commissioner.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 397, § 41.

CSA:

C. 69, § 101.

CRS 53:

§ 7-6-41.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-5-41.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3278, § 622, effective March 1, 2022.